District of Columbia statutes.
5-1201

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)

“State” means the several states of the United States, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, American Samoa, and Guam.

(1-a)

“State agent” means any person compensated directly or indirectly by a state or who in any way assists in the administration of the enforcement of laws of a state relating to alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or tobacco products.

(2)

“State official” means any agent, employee, or representative officially responsible for the administration and enforcement of laws of a state relating to alcoholic beverages, tobacco, and tobacco products.

Sept. 9, 1978, D.C. Law 2-102, § 2, 25 DCR 303
July 25, 1985, D.C. Law 6-12, § 2(a), 32 DCR 3232
1981 Ed., § 4-1001.
1973 Ed., § 4-1101.